Massachusetts, session 194th, S1398.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 19 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by adding the following section at the end thereof: -  
Section 25. There shall be, within the department of mental health, at least two intensive 
stabilization and treatment units for patients who exhibit persistently aggressive or self-
destructive behavior or exhibit atypically, intensively violent behavior that requires specialized 
care. One unit shall be designated for men and one unit shall be designated for women. Said 
units shall be located at a specific and central location and be secured and physically separate 
from other units. These units shall provide comprehensive evaluation, stabilization and 
psychiatric treatment which shall include, but not be limited to: violence assessments, behavioral 
management consultation, interpersonal conflict resolution strategies, critical incident 
debriefings and transfer evaluations. These units shall include appropriate staffing levels to 
address the needs of the patient population with an interdisciplinary staff, including but not 

of 2 13 limited to registered nurses, clinical social workers, mental health workers, psychiatrists, clinical 
psychologists and rehabilitation specialists, who have undergone specialized training to work 
effectively with this patient population. Upon behavior stabilization, the staff on the unit shall 
develop a plan for the safe and timely transfer of the patient out of the intensive stabilization and 
treatment unit.